Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Chapter 45. Regulation of Lobbying.

Cross references. —

For limitations on lobbying by public entities, see AS

44.99.030

. For discussion of changes made to this chapter by ch. 47, SLA 2007, see 2007 Alas. AG Lexis 17 (May 17, 2007).

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska public offices commission complaints and investigations, see 2 AAC 50, art. 3.

For regulation of lobbying, see 2 AAC 50, art. 4.